Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0370.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) This act may be cited as the Tricare premium reimbursement program act. (2) As used in this act: (a) Department means the department of military and veterans affairs. (b) Eligible recipient means a member of the Michigan National Guard who is eligible for coverage under the Tricare reserve select program or the Tricare dental program and meets any other eligibility criteria established by the department. (c) Fund means the Michigan National Guard member benefit fund created in the Michigan National Guard member benefit fund act. (d) Program means the Tricare premium reimbursement program created in section 3. (e) Tricare dental program means a voluntary dental health insurance plan for eligible recipients who are not on active duty and are not covered by a traditional assistance management program, an existing health insurance program through an employer, or a private market plan. (f) Tricare reserve select program means a voluntary health insurance plan for eligible recipients who are not on active duty and are not covered by a traditional assistance management program, an existing health insurance program through an employer, or a private market plan. Sec. 3. (1) The department shall create and operate a Tricare premium reimbursement program. Under the program, the department shall, if there is sufficient money in the fund to cover the reimbursements, make reimbursements to eligible recipients who meet the reimbursement application requirements for a premium paid for either or both of the following: (a) Individual coverage through the Tricare reserve select program. (b) Individual coverage under the Tricare dental program. (2) To apply for reimbursement under the program, an eligible recipient must submit an application to the department using a form, as determined by the department, that contains the information required by the department. The department shall make the form described in this subsection, and the instructions for completing and submitting the form, available on the departments website. Sec. 5. The department shall promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 540. (b) Senate Bill No. 542. (c) House Bill No. 4962. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor